Utah statutes.
51-5-7.   Expending plans and administrative expenses provided by
legislative appropriation and included in governor's budget.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), the revenues and other
resources of the governmental funds are subject to legislative review and
appropriation for each fiscal period.
(b)  Restricted Special Revenue Funds are subject to legislative review for
each fiscal period.
(2)  Notwithstanding the source of the revenues and the restrictions imposed
upon the expenditure of the revenues, the planned expenditures for the
governmental funds, except Restricted Special Revenue Funds, shall be
incorporated into the governor's budget and submitted to the Legislature
according to Section 63J-1-201.
(3)  Expenses required in the administrative activities of the Restricted
Special Revenue Funds, the Enterprise Funds, the Internal Service Funds, and
the Trust and Agency Funds are subject to legislative review each year.
(a)  Pro forma financial statements, including balance sheets, revenue and
expenditure statements, statements of changes in financial position, and other
statements that may be required for these funds shall be included in the
governor's budget as information items and submitted to the Legislature
according to Section 63J-1-201.
(b)  If the operating results of any of these funds demonstrate that an
appropriation is needed from any other fund or subfund, that appropriation
shall be included in the governor's budget as a budget request.
